District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1104

Proposed changes in law to be submitted to Commission; hearings; recommendations to Congress.

Repealed.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-153, § 3(a), 31 DCR 6440

History

1981 Ed., § 43-504.

Prior Codifications